Wisconsin, session 2025, AB41.
do enact as follows:AB41,13Section 1. 66.04075 of the statutes is created to read:AB41,1,4466.04075 Vegetable and flower gardens. (1) In this section:AB41,1,55(a) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.AB41,1,76(b) “Vegetable garden” means a plot of ground or elevated soil bed that is 7located on a residential property and in which any of the following are grown:AB41,1,881. Vegetables, herbs, fruits, leafy greens, or other edible plants.AB41,2,112. Flowers.AB41,2,223. Pollinator plants.AB41,2,43(2) A political subdivision may not require a permit for or prohibit the 4cultivation of a vegetable garden on property not owned by the political subdivision.AB41,2,65(3) This section does not affect the power of a municipality to do any of the 6following if the regulation does not specifically regulate vegetable gardens:AB41,2,77(a) Enact a zoning ordinance.AB41,2,88(b) Regulate the use of water or fertilizer.AB41,2,109(c) Control noxious weeds, as defined under s. 66.0407 (1) (b), or invasive 10species.AB41,2,1111